Delaware, session 153, SB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 5314, Title 25 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5314. Tenantâs right to early termination. (b) Upon 30 daysâ written notice, which 30-day period shall begin begins on the first day of the month following the day of actual notice, the tenancy may be terminated: terminated as follows: (1) By the a tenant, whenever a change in location of the tenantâs employment with the tenantâs present employer requires a change in the location of the tenantâs residence in excess of 30 miles; of more than 30 miles. (2) By the a tenant, whenever the serious illness of the tenant or the death or serious illness of a member of the tenantâs immediate family, residing therein, requires a change in the location of the tenantâs residence on a permanent basis; basis. (3) By the a tenant, when the tenant is accepted for admission to a senior citizensâ housing facility, including subsidized public or private housing, or a group or cooperative living facility or retirement home; long-term care facility as defined in Â§ 1102 of Title 16. (4) By the a tenant, when the tenant is accepted for admission into a rental unit subsidized by a governmental entity or by a private nonprofit corporation, including subsidized private or public housing; housing. (5) By the a tenant who, after the execution of such rental agreement, enters the military service of the United States on active duty; duty. (6) By a tenant who is the victim of domestic abuse, sexual offenses, or stalking, or a tenant who has obtained or is seeking relief from domestic violence or abuse from any court, police agency, or domestic violence program or service; service. (7) By the surviving spouse or personal representative of the estate of the a tenant, upon the death of the tenant. (8) By the tenant, when the tenant enters into a contract to purchase real property the tenant intends to occupy as a primary residence.